fi: Öljynjäähdyttimen kennotyyppi: Tanko-levy; Mikrokanava; Levy-lamelli; Vaippa-putki; Kerroslevy; Putki-lamelli; Muu
ru: Тип сердцевины масляного радиатора: Пластинчато-брусковый; Микроканальный; Пластинчато-ребристый; Кожухотрубный; Многопластинчатый; Трубчато-ребристый; Другое
en: Oil cooler core type: Bar-and-plate; Microchannel; Plate-and-fin; Shell-and-tube; Stacked-plate; Tube-and-fin; Other
hu: Olajhűtő mag típusa: Rúd és lemez (Bar-and-plate); Mikrocsatornás; Lemezes-bordás (Plate-and-fin); Csőköteges (Shell-and-tube); Rakott lemezes (Stacked-plate); Csöves-bordás (Tube-and-fin); Egyéb
th: ประเภทแกนระบายความร้อนน้ำมัน: บาร์แอนด์เพลต (Bar-and-plate); ไมโครแชนแนล (Microchannel); เพลตแอนด์ฟิน (Plate-and-fin); เชลล์แอนด์ทูบ (Shell-and-tube); สแต็กเพลต (Stacked-plate); ทูบแอนด์ฟิน (Tube-and-fin); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta jezgre hladnjaka ulja: S profilima i pločama; Mikrokanal; S pločama i lamelama; S omotačem i cijevima; Naslagane ploče; S cijevima i lamelama; Ostalo
de: Typ des Ölkühlerkerns: Bar-and-Plate; Mikrokanal; Plate-and-Fin; Rohrbündel; Plattenkühler; Tube-and-Fin; Andere
nb: Kjernetype for oljekjøler: Stang-og-plate; Mikrokanal; Plate-og-finne; Rør-og-skall; Stablet plate; Rør-og-finne; Annet
sk-SK: Typ jadra chladiča oleja: Tyčový a doskový; Mikrokanálový; Doskový s rebrami; Rúrkový a plášťový; Skladaný doskový; Rúrkový s rebrami; Iné
el: Τύπος πλέγματος ψυγείου λαδιού: Με ράβδους και πλάκες; Μικροκαναλιών; Με πλάκες και πτερύγια; Με κέλυφος και αυλούς; Με στοιβαγμένες πλάκες; Με αυλούς και πτερύγια; Άλλο
sv: Typ av oljekylarkärna: Bar and plate; Mikrokanal; Plattor och flänsar; Skal och rör; Staplade plattor; Rör och fläns; Övrigt
pt-PT: tipo de núcleo do refrigerador de óleo: Barra e placa; Microcanal; Placa e alheta; Invólucro e tubo; Placas sobrepostas; Tubo e alheta; Outro
es: Tipo de núcleo del enfriador de aceite: Barras y placas; Microcanal; Placas y aletas; Carcasa y tubos; Placas apiladas; Tubos y aletas; Otro
da: Kernetype for oliekøler: Bar-and-plate; Mikrokanal; Plate-and-fin; Shell-and-tube; Stablede plader; Tube-and-fin; Andet
lt-LT: Alyvos aušintuvo šerdies tipas: Sijinis ir plokštelinis; Mikrokanalinis; Plokštelinis ir briauninis; Vamzdelinis su apvalkalu; Sudėtų plokštelių; Vamzdelinis ir briauninis; Kita
ko: 오일 쿨러 코어 유형: 바-플레이트형; 마이크로채널; 플레이트-핀형; 셸-튜브형; 적층 플레이트형; 튜브-핀형; 기타
nl: Oliekoeler kerntype: Staaf en plaat; Microkanaal; Plaat en lamel; Buis en schaal; Gestapelde plaat; Buis en lamel; Overig
pt-BR: Radiador de óleo núcleo tipo: Barra e placa; Microcanal; Placa e aleta; Casco e tubo; Placas sobrepostas; Tubo e aleta; Outro
vi: Loại lõi làm mát dầu: Dạng tấm và thanh; Dạng rãnh vi mô; Dạng tấm và vây; Dạng ống và vỏ; Dạng tấm xếp chồng; Dạng ống và vây; Khác
ja: オイルクーラーコアタイプ: バーアンドプレート; マイクロチャネル; プレートアンドフィン; シェルアンドチューブ; スタックトプレート; チューブアンドフィン; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta jedra hladilnika olja: Ploščati (bar-and-plate); Mikrokanalni; Ploščati z rebri (plate-and-fin); Cevni (shell-and-tube); Zložen ploščati; Cevni z rebri (tube-and-fin); Drugo
bg-BG: Тип сърцевина на масления охладител: Оребрен с пластини; Микроканален; Пластинчат с ребра; Кожухотръбен; С подредени пластини; Тръбен с ребра; Друго
pl: Typ rdzenia chłodnicy oleju: Sztabowo-płytowy; Mikrokanałowy; Płytowo-żebrowy; Płaszczowo-rurowy; Wielopłytowy; Rurowo-żebrowy; Inny
fr: Type de cœur du refroidisseur d’huile: À barres et à plaques; Microcanaux; À plaques et à ailettes; Tubes et calandre; À plaques empilées; À tubes et à ailettes; Autre
zh-CN: 油冷却器芯型: 棒板式; 微通道; 板翅式; 管壳式; 叠板式; 管翅式; 其他
it: Tipo di massa radiante del radiatore dell'olio: A barre e piastre; A microcanali; A piastre e alette; A fascio tubiero; A piastre impilate; A tubi e alette; Altro
tr: Yağ soğutucu çekirdek tipi: Çubuk ve plaka; Mikrokanallı; Plaka ve kanatçık; Gövde ve boru; Yığılmış plaka; Boru ve kanatçık; Diğer
cs: Typ jádra chladiče oleje: Deskový s žebry; Mikrokanálkový; Deskový lamelový; Trubkový; Skládaný deskový; Trubkový lamelový; Ostatní
zh-TW: 機油冷卻器芯體類型: 板條式; 微通道式; 板鰭式; 殼管式; 疊板式; 管鰭式; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul miezului radiatorului de ulei: Cu bare și plăci; Microcanal; Cu plăci și aripioare; Cu manta și fascicul tubular; Cu plăci suprapuse; Cu tuburi și aripioare; Altele